Utah statutes.
31A-17-610.   Foreign insurers or health organizations.
(1) (a)  Any foreign insurer or health organization shall, upon the written
request of the commissioner, submit to the commissioner an RBC report as of
the end of the most recent calendar year by the later of:
(i)  the date an RBC report would be required to be filed by a domestic
insurer or health organization under this part; or
(ii)  15 days after the request is received by the foreign insurer or health
organization.
(b)  Any foreign insurer or health organization shall, at the written request
of the commissioner, promptly submit to the commissioner a copy of any RBC
plan that is filed with the insurance commissioner of any other state.
(2) (a)  The commissioner may require a foreign insurer or health organization
to file an RBC plan with the commissioner if:
(i)  there is a company action level event, regulatory action level event, or
authorized control level event with respect to the foreign insurer or health
organization as determined under:
(A)  the RBC statute applicable in the state of domicile of the insurer or
health organization; or
(B)  if no RBC statute is in force in that state, under this part; and
(ii)  the insurance commissioner of the state of domicile of the foreign
insurer or health organization fails to require the foreign insurer or health
organization to file an RBC plan in the manner specified under:
(A)  that state's RBC statute; or
(B)  if no RBC statute is in force in that state, under Section 31A-17-603.
(b)  If the commissioner requires a foreign insurer or health organization to
file an RBC plan, the failure of the foreign insurer or health organization to
file the RBC plan with the commissioner is grounds to order the insurer or
health organization to cease and desist from writing new insurance business in
this state.
(3)  The commissioner may make application to the Third District Court for
Salt Lake County permitted under Section 31A-27a-901 with respect to the
liquidation of property of a foreign insurer or health organization found in
this state if:
(a)  a mandatory control level event occurs with respect to any foreign
insurer or health organization; and
(b)  no domiciliary receiver has been appointed with respect to the foreign
insurer or health organization under the rehabilitation and liquidation
statute applicable in the state of domicile of the foreign insurer or health
organization.
